Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2105
Tax; administration; information and returns; penalty.

The Tax Commissioner shall have charge of the administration of sections 77-2101 to 77-2116 and shall make such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out such sections. He or she shall have authority to require all persons or corporations liable for the payment of the transfer or excise tax to file returns on such forms and at such times as he or she may require. The county attorneys of the state shall furnish the commissioner with such information as he or she may require from time to time with reference to estates pending in the county courts of Nebraska. Any person or corporation who fails to furnish the commissioner with such information or reports as he or she requires under such sections shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1929, c. 73, § 5, p. 255;

C.S.1929, § 77-2305;

R.S.1943, § 77-2105;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 229;

Laws 1984, LB 962, § 7;

Laws 1992, LB 1004, § 9;

Laws 2002, LB 905, § 8.